Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.120

Competitive solicitation.

(1) Insofar as practicable, all purchases of or contracts for goods and services must be based on a competitive solicitation process. This process may include electronic or web-based solicitations, bids, and signatures. This requirement also applies to procurement of goods and services executed by agencies under delegated authority granted in accordance with RCW 39.26.090 or under RCW 28B.10.029.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to contract amendments that substantially change the scope of work of the original contract or substantially increase the value of the original contract.

[ 2012 c 224 s 13.]